Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.180

Money from sale protected.

The money paid to the owner is entitled to the same protection against legal process and the voluntary disposition of the other spouse or other domestic partner which the law gives to the homestead.

[ 2008 c 6 s 636; 1987 c 442 s 218; 1981 c 329 s 20; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 10; 1895 c 64 s 21; RRS s 549. Formerly RCW 6.12.260.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.